Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1729
Violations of code; criminal penalties; enforcement.

(1) Any person who willfully violates any provision of the Commodity Code or any rule, regulation, or order of the director under the code shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(2) Any person convicted of violating a rule, regulation, or order under the code may be fined but may not be imprisoned if the person proves he or she had no knowledge of the rule, regulation, or order.

(3) The director may refer such evidence as is available concerning violations of the code or any rule, regulation, or order of the director to the Attorney General or county attorney who may, with or without reference from the director, initiate criminal proceedings pursuant to the code.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 29.